District of Columbia statutes.
19-1310.05

Limitation of action against trustee.

(a)

A beneficiary may not commence a proceeding against a trustee for breach of trust more than one year after the date the beneficiary or a representative of the beneficiary was sent a report that adequately disclosed the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust and informed the beneficiary of the time allowed for commencing a proceeding.

(b)

A report adequately discloses the existence of a potential claim for breach of trust if it provides sufficient information so that the beneficiary or representative knows of the potential claim or should have inquired into its existence.

(c)

If subsection (a) of this section does not apply, a judicial proceeding by a beneficiary against a trustee for breach of trust must be commenced within 3 years after the first to occur of:

(1)

The removal, resignation, or death of the trustee;

(2)

The termination of the beneficiary’s interest in the trust; or

(3)

The termination of the trust.

History

Mar. 10, 2004, D.C. Law 15-104, § 2(b), 51 DCR 208

Section References

This section is referenced in § 19-1308.02.

Editor's Notes

Uniform Law: This section is based upon § 1005 of the Uniform Trust Code.